fi: Elektroniikka > Veneen elektroniikka > Kaikuluotaimen lisävaruste: Kaikuluotaimen teline; Kaikuluotaimen anturi
da: Elektronik > Marineelektronik > Ekkolod-tilbehør: Ekkolod-beslag; Ekkolod-transducere
es: Electrónica > Electrónuca náutica > Accesorios de buscador de peces: Soportes para buscador de peces; Transductores de buscador de peces
nb: Elektronikk > Marin elektronikk > Fiskesonar-tilbehør: Fiskesonar-fester; Fiskesonar-svingere
ja: 電子機器 > 航海計器 > 魚群探知機アクセサリー: 魚群探知機マウント; 魚群探知機用振動子
sv: Elektronik > Marinelektronik > Ekolodstillbehör: Ekolodsfästen; Ekolodsgivare
ru: Электроника > Судовая электроника > Аксессуары для эхолотов: Крепления для эхолотов; Датчики эхолотов
ro-RO: Electronice > Dispozitive electronice maritime > Accesorii pentru sonar de pescuit: Suporturi pentru sonare de pescuit; Traductoare pentru sonar de pescuit
de: Elektronik > Elektrische Instrumente Seefahrt > Fischfinder-Zubehör: Fischfinder-Halterungen; Fischfinder-Geber
fr: Appareil électronique > Appareils électroniques marins > Accessoires pour sondeur: Supports pour sondeur; Transducteurs de sondeur
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị điện hàng hải > Phụ kiện máy tìm cá: Giá gắn máy tìm cá; Bộ chuyển đổi máy tìm cá
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ναυτικά ηλεκτρονικά είδη > Αξεσουάρ ιχνηθέτη ψαριών: Βάσεις ιχνηθέτη ψαριών; Μετατροπείς ιχνηθέτη ψαριών
it: Elettronica > Dispositivi elettronici nautici > Accessori per ecoscandaglio: Supporti per ecoscandaglio; Trasduttori per ecoscandaglio
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 船舶電子裝置 > 魚群探測器配件: 魚群探測器安裝架; 魚群探測器換能器
sl-SI: Elektronika > Navtična elektronika > Dodatki za iskalnike rib: Nosilci za iskalnike rib; Pretvorniki za iskalnike rib
hr-HR: Elektronika > Brodska elektronika > Dodaci za sonar za ribu: Nosači za sonar za ribu; Pretvornici za sonar za ribu
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ทางทะเล > อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องหาปลา: ขาตั้งเครื่องหาปลา; หัวส่งสัญญาณเครื่องหาปลา
ko: 전자기기 > 해상용 전자기기 > 어군 탐지기 액세서리: 어군 탐지기 마운트; 어군 탐지기 트랜스듀서
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 航海电子设备 > 鱼探仪配件: 鱼探仪支架; 鱼探仪换能器
bg-BG: Електроника > Морска електроника > Аксесоари за ехолот: Стойки за ехолот; Датчици за ехолот
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Equipamentos eletrônicos de navegação > Acessórios para localizador de peixes: Suportes para localizador de peixes; Transdutores para localizador de peixes
cs: Elektronika > Námořní elektronika > Příslušenství rybářských sond: Držáky rybářských sond; Snímače rybářských sond
tr: Elektronik > Deniz Elektronik Sistemleri > Balık Bulucu Aksesuarları: Balık Bulucu Montaj Aparatları; Balık Bulucu Transdüserleri
pl: Elektronika > Elektronika morska > Akcesoria do echosond: Mocowania echosond; Przetworniki echosond
en: Electronics > Marine Electronics > Fish Finder Accessories: Fish Finder Mounts; Fish Finder Transducers
nl: Elektronica > Elektronica voor boten > Fishfinder accessoires: Fishfinder bevestigingen; Fishfinder transducers
sk-SK: Elektronika > Námorné elektronické zariadenia > Príslušenstvo sonarov: Držiaky sonarov; Sondy sonarov
lt-LT: Elektronika > Jūrinė elektronika > Žuvų detektorių priedai: Žuvų detektorių laikikliai; Žuvų detektorių keitikliai
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Eletrónica marinha > Acessórios de detetor de peixes: Suportes de detetor de peixes; Transdutores de detetor de peixes
hu: Elektronika > Tengeri elektronika > Halradar-kiegészítők: Halradartartók; Halradarjeladók